Utah statutes.
78B-5-602.   Entries in official records as evidence.

Entries in public or other official books or records, made by a public officer in the performance of the officer's official duties or by any other person in the performance of a duty specially enjoined by the law, are prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the entry.

